Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1427XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1427XD (4) 91
th/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 321.284, Code 2025, is amended to read
as follows:
321.284 Open containers in motor vehicles —— drivers.
1. A driver of person operating a motor vehicle upon a
public street or highway shall not possess in the passenger
area of the motor vehicle an open or unsealed bottle, can,
jar, or other receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage or
a beverage containing any amount of tetrahydrocannabinol.
“Passenger area” means the area designed to seat the driver and
passengers while the motor vehicle is in operation and any area
that is readily accessible to the driver or a passenger while
in their seating positions, including the glove compartment.
An open or unsealed receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage
or an otherwise lawful beverage containing tetrahydrocannabinol
may be transported in the trunk of the motor vehicle. An
unsealed receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage or an
otherwise lawful beverage containing tetrahydrocannabinol
may be transported behind the last upright seat of the motor
vehicle if the motor vehicle does not have a trunk. A person
convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of a simple
misdemeanor punishable as a scheduled violation under section
805.8A, subsection 14, paragraph “e”.
2. A person under the age of twenty-one who violates
possesses an alcoholic beverage in violation of this section is
guilty of a violation of section 123.47.
Sec. 2. Section 321.284A, subsections 1 and 4, Code 2025,
are amended to read as follows:
1. A passenger in a motor vehicle upon a public street
or highway shall not possess in the passenger area of the
motor vehicle an open or unsealed bottle, can, jar, or other
receptacle containing an alcoholic beverage or a beverage
containing any amount of tetrahydrocannabinol. “Passenger
area” means the area of a motor vehicle designed to seat the
driver and passengers while the motor vehicle is in operation
and any area that is readily accessible to the driver or a
LSB 1427XD (4) 91
-1- th/ns 1/3

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
passenger while in their seating positions, including the glove
compartment. An open or unsealed receptacle containing an
alcoholic beverage or an otherwise lawful beverage containing
tetrahydrocannabinol may be transported in the trunk of
the motor vehicle. An unsealed receptacle containing an
alcoholic beverage or an otherwise lawful beverage containing
tetrahydrocannabinol may be transported behind the last upright
seat of the motor vehicle if the motor vehicle does not have a
trunk.
4. A person under the age of twenty-one years who violates
possesses an alcoholic beverage in violation of this section is
guilty of a violation of section 123.47.